Massachusetts, session 194th, S2063.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
“1996” in line 298, the following new sentence:-
“Any conduits, wires and pipes that extend above ground and compress, transport, or
directly assist with the compression or transportation of natural gas will not be exempt from
taxation of the corporations or limited liability companies described in this section.”
of 1